it: Caratteristiche degli accessori per la culla: Antibatterico; Traspirante; Bordi elasticizzati; Ipoallergenico; Lavabile in lavatrice; Materiale organico; Ad asciugatura rapida; Reversibile; Elasticizzato; Termoregolatore; Altro
en: Crib accessory features: Antibacterial; Breathable; Elasticated edges; Hypoallergenic; Machine washable; Organic material; Quick drying; Reversible; Stretch fit; Temperature regulating; Other
nl: Kenmerken ledikantaccessoires: Antibacterieel; Ademend; Elastische randen; Hypoallergeen; Machinewasbaar; Biologisch materiaal; Sneldrogend; Omkeerbaar; Stretch-pasvorm; Temperatuurregulerend; Overige
pl: Funkcje akcesoriów do łóżeczka: Antybakteryjne; Oddychające; Elastyczne krawędzie; Hipoalergiczne; Można prać w pralce; Materiał ekologiczny; Szybkoschnące; Dwustronne; Elastyczne dopasowanie; Termoregulacyjne; Inne
es: Características de accesorios de la cuna: Antibacteriano; Transpirable; Bordes elásticos; Hipoalergénico; Lavable a máquina; Material orgánico; De secado rápido; Reversible; Ajuste elástico; Regulador de temperatura; Otro
da: Krybbetilbehørets funktioner: Antibakteriel; Åndbar; Elastiske kanter; Allergivenlig; Kan maskinvaskes; Økologisk materiale; Hurtigtørrende; Vendbar; Strækpasform; Temperaturregulerende; Andet
ko: 아기침대 액세서리 기능: 항균; 통기성; 밴딩 테두리; 저자극성; 기계 세탁 가능; 유기농 소재; 빠른 건조; 양면 사용 가능; 스트레치 핏; 온도 조절; 기타
ro-RO: Caracteristici accesorii pentru pătuț: Antibacterian; Respirabil; Margini elasticizate; Hipoalergenic; Lavabil la mașină; Material organic; Uscare rapidă; Reversibil; Potrivire elastică; Termoreglator; Altele
zh-TW: 嬰兒床配件功能: 抗菌; 透氣; 鬆緊邊緣; 抗過敏; 可機洗; 有機材質; 快乾; 雙面用; 彈性貼合; 溫度調節; 其他
vi: Tính năng phụ kiện cũi em bé: Kháng khuẩn; Thoáng khí; Mép co giãn; Không gây dị ứng; Có thể giặt máy; Chất liệu hữu cơ; Nhanh khô; Có thể đảo ngược; Co giãn ôm sát; Điều hòa nhiệt độ; Khác
ru: Функции аксессуаров для кроватки: Антибактериальные; Дышащие; Края на резинке; Гипоаллергенные; Можно стирать в машине; Органический материал; Быстросохнущие; Двусторонние; Эластичная посадка; Терморегулирующие; Другое
el: Χαρακτηριστικά αξεσουάρ κούνιας: Αντιβακτηριακό; Αναπνέον; Ελαστικές άκρες; Υποαλλεργικό; Πλένεται στο πλυντήριο; Οργανικό υλικό; Γρήγορο στέγνωμα; Διπλής όψης; Ελαστική εφαρμογή; Ρύθμιση θερμοκρασίας; Άλλο
fi: Pinnasängyn mukana tulevat lisävarusteet: Antibakteerinen; Hengittävä; Joustavat reunat; Hypoallergeeninen; Konepestävä; Luomumateriaali; Nopeasti kuivuva; Käännettävä; Venytettävä; Lämpötilaa säätelevä; Muu
fr: Caractéristiques des accessoires pour lit bébé: Antibactérien; Respirant; Bords élastiqués; Hypoallergénique; Lavable en machine; Matière biologique; Séchage rapide; Réversible; Coupe extensible; Régulateur de température; Autre
cs: Vlastnosti příslušenství k dětské postýlce: Antibakteriální; Prodyšné; Elastické okraje; Hypoalergenní; Lze prát v pračce; Organický materiál; Rychleschnoucí; Oboustranné; Elastický střih; Termoregulační; Ostatní
nb: Funksjoner for barneseng-tilbehør: Antibakteriell; Pustende; Elastiske kanter; Allergivennlig; Kan maskinvaskes; Økologisk materiale; Hurtigtørkende; Vendbar; Stretch-passform; Temperaturregulerende; Annet
pt-BR: Características dos acessórios de berço: Antibacteriano; Respirável; Bordas com elástico; Hipoalergênico; Lavável à máquina; Material orgânico; Secagem rápida; Reversível; Ajuste com elasticidade; Regulador de temperatura; Outros
hr-HR: Značajke dodataka za dječji krevetić: Antibakterijsko; Prozračno; Elastični rubovi; Hipoalergeno; Perivo u perilici rublja; Organski materijal; Brzo sušenje; Obostrano; Rastezljivo; Reguliranje temperature; Ostalo
de: Eigenschaften des Krippenzubehörs: Antibakteriell; Atmungsaktiv; Elastische Kanten; Hypoallergen; Maschinenwaschbar; Bio-Material; Schnelltrocknend; Wendbar; Stretch-Passform; Temperaturregulierend; Andere
pt-PT: Características dos acessórios para berços: Antibacteriano; Respirável; Bordos elásticos; Hipoalergénico; Lavável na máquina; Material orgânico; Secagem rápida; Reversível; Ajuste elástico; Regulador de temperatura; Outro
sk-SK: Funkcie príslušenstva detskej postieľky: Antibakteriálne; Priedušné; Elastické okraje; Hypoalergénne; Vhodné do práčky; Organický materiál; Rýchloschnúce; Obojstranné; Elastický strih; Regulujúce teplotu; Iné
bg-BG: Характеристики на аксесоари за бебешкото легло: Антибактериални; Дишащи; Еластични ръбове; Хипоалергенни; Подходящи за машинно пране; Органичен материал; Бързосъхнещи; Двулицеви; Еластично прилягане; Регулиращи температурата; Други
ja: ベビーベッドアクセサリー機能: 抗菌性; 通気性; ゴム入りエッジ; 低刺激性; 洗濯機洗い可; オーガニック素材; 速乾性; リバーシブル; ストレッチフィット; 温度調節; その他
lt-LT: Lovytės priedų ypatybės: Antibakterinis; Laidus orui; Elastiniai kraštai; Hipoalerginis; Plaunamas skalbyklėje; Ekologiška medžiaga; Greitai džiūstantis; Dvipusis; Tampraus prigludimo; Reguliuojantis temperatūrą; Kita
hu: Bölcső kiegészítő funkciói: Antibakteriális; Légáteresztő; Gumírozott szélek; Hipoallergén; Gépben mosható; Organikus anyag; Gyorsan száradó; Kifordítható; Rugalmasan illeszkedő; Hőmérséklet-szabályozó; Egyéb
sl-SI: Lastnosti dodatkov za otroško posteljico: Antibakterijsko; Zračno; Elastični robovi; Hipoalergeno; Pralno v pralnem stroju; Ekološki material; Hitro sušenje; Obojestransko; Raztegljivo prileganje; Uravnavanje temperature; Drugo
zh-CN: 婴儿床配件特点: 抗菌; 透气; 弹性边缘; 低敏; 可机洗; 有机材料; 速干; 双面可用; 弹力贴合; 控温; 其他
th: คุณสมบัติของอุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเปลเด็ก: ยับยั้งแบคทีเรีย; ระบายอากาศ; ขอบยางยืด; ไม่ก่อให้เกิดภูมิแพ้; ซักเครื่องได้; วัสดุออร์แกนิก; แห้งเร็ว; พลิกใช้ได้ 2 ด้าน; ผ้ายืดกระชับ; ปรับอุณหภูมิได้; อื่นๆ
sv: Detaljer för spjälsängstillbehör: Antibakteriell; Ventilerande; Elastiska kanter; Hypoallergen; Maskintvättbar; Ekologiskt material; Snabbtorkande; Vändbar; Stretchpassform; Temperaturreglerande; Övrigt
tr: Beşik aksesuarı özellikleri: Antibakteriyel; Nefes alabilen; Elastik kenarlar; Hipoalerjenik; Makinede yıkanabilir; Organik malzeme; Hızlı kuruyan; Çift taraflı; Esnek kesim; Isı düzenleyici; Diğer